Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3314
Certificate of authority; director; issuance; conditions.

The director shall issue a certificate of authority to a corporation organized under the provisions of sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 if:

(1) He or she finds that all requirements of law have been met;

(2) He or she is satisfied that all natural persons who are incorporators, the directors and principal officers of corporate incorporators, and the proposed directors and officers of the corporation being formed are trustworthy, competent, and collectively have the competence and experience to engage in the particular insurance business proposed; and

(3) He or she is satisfied that the business plan is consistent with the interests of the corporation's potential insureds and of the public.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 14.